Utah statutes.
53B-18-203.   Federal aid for experiment station.

(1)  The governor may apply to the Secretary of the Treasury to obtain any appropriation made by Congress relating to the federal laws referred to in Section 53B-18-204.  Whenever the university and agricultural experiment station shall be entitled to any money under these acts or similar acts the university shall execute and file with the Secretary of the Treasury an agreement to expend the money received for the sole and exclusive purpose expressed in such act and in the manner therein directed, and to maintain a farm of at least 25 acres in connection with Utah State University.  The university shall also comply with all conditions expressed in the acts.

(2)  The university shall execute and file with the Secretary of the Treasury an agreement relating to the expenditure of funds received under the laws referred to in Subsection (1) that the funds will be used for the exclusive purpose directed in those laws.

(3)  The university shall comply with all conditions expressed in the laws referred to in Subsection (1) in order to receive money under those laws.

